District of Columbia statutes.
2-1011

Annual report to Congress; annual estimate to Office of Management and Budget.

Said Commission shall report to Congress annually on the 1st Monday of March the lands acquired during the preceding fiscal year, the method of acquisition, and the cost of each tract. It shall also submit to the Office of Management and Budget on or before December 15th of each year its estimate of the total sum to be appropriated for expenditure under the provisions of §§ 2-1001 to 2-1011 during the succeeding fiscal year.

History

June 6, 1924, 43 Stat. 464, ch. 270, § 13
July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 791, ch. 949, § 2
Apr. 21, 1976, 90 Stat. 379, Pub. L. 94-273, § 21

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1007.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2011.
1973 Ed., § 1-1013.